Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-246
Wild mammals, defined.

Wild mammals means the species of mammals native to, migrating to or through, or having established free-ranging populations in the State of Nebraska except the fallow deer, the house mouse, the Norway rat, the black rat, the feral domestic dog, and the feral domestic cat.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 56;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 11.